Utah statutes.
53-6-304.   Waiver of training course requirement.

(1)  The director may waive the required basic dispatcher training course and certify an applicant who:

(a)  provides evidence that the applicant meets the requirements under Section 53-6-302, relating to qualifications for admission to the training course;

(b)  provides evidence that the applicant has completed a basic dispatcher training program that, in the director's judgment, is equivalent to the course required for certification under this part; and

(c)  passes the certification examination.

(2)  An applicant who fails the examination under Subsection (1)(c) shall complete the basic dispatcher training course and pass the certification examination to become certified.

